src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Quenya language adjectives inflect by number, and may receive nominal cases.


! A inflections (adjectives that end with -Ca)
LEXICON AdjSuffix
    +A: AdjSuper ;
LEXICON AdjSuper
    @U.AdjSup.TRUE@+Superl:@U.AdjSup.TRUE@ AdjNumber ;
    @U.AdjSup.FALSE@ AdjNumber ;
LEXICON AdjNumber
    :a AdjPost ;
    +Nsing:e # ;
LEXICON AdjPost
    # ;  ! Could stop right here, even without being labelled as +Sing+Nom or anything
    :%> Cases ;  ! may be treated directly as a noun, or otherwise receive case endings for its noun

! EA inflections (adjectives that end with -ea)
LEXICON AdjSuffix-EA
    +A: AdjSuper-EA ;
LEXICON AdjSuper-EA
    @U.AdjSup.TRUE@+Superl:@U.AdjSup.TRUE@ AdjNumber-EA ;
    @U.AdjSup.FALSE@ AdjNumber-EA ;
LEXICON AdjNumber-EA
    :ea AdjPost-EA ;
    +Nsing:ie # ;
LEXICON AdjPost-EA
    # ;  ! Could stop right here, even without being labelled as +Sing+Nom or anything
    :%> Cases ;  ! may be treated directly as a noun, or otherwise receive case endings for its noun

! E inflections (adjectives that end with -Ce)
LEXICON AdjSuffix-E
    +A: AdjSuper-E ;
LEXICON AdjSuper-E
    @U.AdjSup.TRUE@+Superl:@U.AdjSup.TRUE@ AdjNumber-E ;
    @U.AdjSup.FALSE@ AdjNumber-E ;
LEXICON AdjNumber-E
    :e AdjPost-E ;
    +Nsing:i # ;
LEXICON AdjPost-E
    # ;  ! Could stop right here, even without being labelled as +Sing+Nom or anything
    :%> Cases-E ;  ! may be treated directly as a noun, or otherwise receive case endings for its noun

! Consonant inflections (adjectives that end with -C, typically -in)
LEXICON AdjSuffix-Cons
    +A: AdjSuper-Cons ;
LEXICON AdjSuper-Cons
    @U.AdjSup.TRUE@+Superl:@U.AdjSup.TRUE@ AdjNumber-Cons ;
    @U.AdjSup.FALSE@ AdjNumber-Cons ;
LEXICON AdjNumber-Cons
    :0 AdjPost-Cons ;
    +Nsing:i # ;
LEXICON AdjPost-Cons
    # ;  ! Could stop right here, even without being labelled as +Sing+Nom or anything
    :%> Cases-Cons ;  ! may be treated directly as a noun, or otherwise receive case endings for its noun

! Special inflections (adjectives that end with -e, which is an -i stem)
LEXICON AdjSuffix-Spec
    +A:* AdjSuper-Spec ;
LEXICON AdjSuper-Spec
    @U.AdjSup.TRUE@+Superl:@U.AdjSup.TRUE@ AdjNumber-Spec ;
    @U.AdjSup.FALSE@ AdjNumber-Spec ;
LEXICON AdjNumber-Spec
    AdjPost-Spec ;
    +Nsing:i # ;
LEXICON AdjPost-Spec
    :e # ;  ! Could stop right here, even without being labelled as +Sing+Nom or anything
    :%> Cases ;  ! may be treated directly as a noun, or otherwise receive case endings for its noun
